Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 4 Division of Information Systems
25-6-308. Acts 1997, No. 803, § 8.

For present law, see §25-30-101 et seq.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2014, No. 104, § 43, provided:

“ADMINISTRATIVE FEES. The Department of Higher Education is authorized to recover non-refundable administrative fees related to the institutional certification and exemption process for out-of-state, non-public, and for-profit colleges and universities. These fees include a notification fee, an application processing fee, and travel expenses for the certification review teams.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2014 through June 30, 2015.”

Acts 2015, No. 978, § 41, provided:

“ADMINISTRATIVE FEES. The Department of Higher Education is authorized to recover non-refundable administrative fees related to the institutional certification and exemption process for out-of-state, non-public, and for-profit colleges and universities. These fees include a notification fee, an application processing fee, and travel expenses for the certification review teams.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Acts 2016, No. 236, § 40, provided: “ADMINISTRATIVE FEES. The Department of Higher Education is authorized to recover non-refundable administrative fees related to the institutional certification and exemption process for out-of-state, non-public, and for-profit colleges and universities. These fees include a notification fee, an application processing fee, and travel expenses for the certification review teams.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Preambles. Identical Acts 1995, Nos. 198 and 355 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the Governor of the State of Arkansas, pursuant to the applicable provision of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended by the Higher Education Act Amendments of 1992, has designated the Arkansas Department of Higher Education to be the State Postsecondary Review Entity for Arkansas for the purpose of participating in the program established by the Higher Education Act Amendments of 1992; and

“Whereas, the Arkansas Department of Higher Education, created by Act 38 of 1971, consists of the State Board of Higher Education and any other divisions which may be created by law and placed under the Department of Higher Education; and

“Whereas, the purpose of this Act is to establish the State Board of Higher Education as the body having final administrative authority, pursuant to Act 38 of 1971, over the State Postsecondary Review Program in Arkansas, and to confirm this designation and confer additional authority and powers upon the State Board of Higher Education as may be necessary.

“Now therefore, be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Arkansas:”

Effective Dates. Acts 1971, No. 38, §§ 23, 24: Feb. 4, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is an immediate need to establish a more responsive and responsible state government sufficiently flexible to meet changing conditions and to establish executive authority in those areas where executive responsibility presently lies and to promote economies in the operation of the government by the consolidation of various departments, boards, and commissions; and that only by the immediate passage of this act may procedures be established for effectuating a more responsive, responsible, and economic state government. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 52, § 10: Mar. 17, 1992. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly, meeting in Extraordinary Session, that in order to attract high technology industry to this state that a highly trained workforce is essential; and that the provisions of this act will provide necessary resources for such workforce. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Identical Acts 1995, Nos. 198 and 355, § 6: Feb. 9, 1995, and Feb. 20, 1995, respectively. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that in order to provide for the continuing eligibility for federal student financial aid of existing postsecondary institutions located in the state and for any postsecondary institution hereafter established, this Act should be given immediate effect. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 1114, § 18: May 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act abolishes the State Board of Higher Education and replaces the board with the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board; and that to provide for an efficient transition and to allow the Governor a sufficient time to make appointments, this act shall become effective May 1, 1997. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on May 1, 1997.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

The director shall report to the Secretary of the Department of Education.

The director, with the advice and consent of the Governor, and the Secretary of the Department of Education, shall appoint the heads of the respective divisions. All of the personnel of the Division of Higher Education shall be employed by and serve at the pleasure of the director. Provided, nothing in this section shall be so construed as to reduce any right which an employee shall have under any civil service or merit system.

Each division of the Division of Higher Education shall be under the direction, control, and supervision of the director. The director may delegate his or her functions, powers, and duties to various divisions of the Division of Higher Education as he or she shall deem desirable or necessary for the effective and efficient operation of the Division of Higher Education.

The several institutions of higher education in this state shall be requested to cooperate with the Division of Higher Education in an effort to coordinate their programs.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2017, No. 565, § 1, provided: “Transfer of the State Board of Private Career Education to the Department of Higher Education.

“(a)(1)The State Board of Private Career Education is transferred to the Department of Higher Education by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)For the purposes of this act, the Department of Higher Education shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing of the State Board of Private Career Education are transferred to the Department of Higher Education, except as specified by this act.

“(c)All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications of the State Board of Private Career Education are transferred to the Director of the Department of Higher Education.

“(d)The employee and designees of the State Board of Private Career Education shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the State Plant Board except as specified in this act.

“(e)The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Amendments. The 2017 amendment redesignated (b) as (b)(1) and (b)2); and substituted “in consultation with the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board” for “by the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board through a search and selection process that includes substantial input, review, and recommendation from the Presidents Council, subject to confirmation” in (b)(2).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” in (a); substituted “Director of the Division of Higher Education” for “Director of the Department of Higher Education” in (b)(1); substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “department” elsewhere throughout the section; added (b)(3); and inserted “and the Secretary of the Department of Education” in the first sentence in (d).

Cross References. Industrial development of business and industry generally, §15-4-101 et seq.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning a postsecondary review entity, was repealed by Acts 1999, No. 478, § 10. The section was derived from Acts 1995, No. 198, §§ 1, 2; 1995, No. 355, §§ 1, 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2014, No. 275, § 20, provided: “ENTERPRISE FRAUD PILOT PROJECT STUDY.

“(a)The Office of Accounting of the Department of Finance and Administration shall conduct an interagency study to determine the most economical and efficient means of implementing an enterprise fraud pilot program that:

“(1)Detects and prevents fraud, waste, abuse, improper payments, and employer noncompliance within:

“(A)The Unemployment Insurance program of the Department of Workforce Services;

“(B)The Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program; and

“(C)The Supplemental Nutritional Assistance Program (SNAP) of the Department of Human Services; and

“(2)Utilizes state-of-the-art enterprise fraud detection technology that further supports detection and prevention across state agencies, programs, and functions.

“(b)The office shall compare and contrast both agency-hosted and vender-hosted solutions.

“(c)(1)No later than October 24, 2014, the office shall report its findings and recommendations to:

“(A)The Legislative Council;

“(B)The Chair of the House Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs; and

“(C)The Chair of the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs.

“(2)The report shall include without limitation funding requirements and possible substantive law changes that would be necessary to implement agency-hosted and vender-hosted solutions.”

Acts 2015, No. 1069, § 20, provided: “ENTERPRISE FRAUD PILOT PROJECT.

“(a)So that savings to Arkansas businesses and taxpayers and recoveries may be realized as soon as possible, at the direction of the Governor, the Office of Accounting in the Department of Finance and Administration shall initiate the Enterprise Fraud Pilot Project focused on fraud, waste, abuse, and improper payments, and employer compliance within the Department of Workforce Services' Unemployment Insurance program, the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program, and the Department of Human Services' Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program that will implement state-of-the-art enterprise fraud detection technology that can further support detection and prevention across state agencies, programs and functions.

“(b)Unless precluded under federal law or regulation or under state law, the Department of Workforce Services' Unemployment Insurance program, the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program, and the Department of Human Services' Supplemental Nutrition Assistance program may support and participate in the efforts of the Department to develop the Enterprise Fraud Pilot Project.

“(c)Unless precluded under federal law or regulation or state law, each state agency shall share any and all data under its control or administration that might have value in detecting or preventing fraud and abuse.

“(d)Upon initiation by the Governor, the request for a bid shall be sent to the Health Reform Legislative Task Force for review, and their recommendation shall be submitted to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee.

“(e)At the direction of the Governor, the department shall enter into a vendor license agreement for the operation of a vendor hosted fraud, waste, abuse and improper payments detection and prevention system. Vendor technology for the project shall include without limitation the following capabilities:

“(1)Automated detection and alerting;

“(2)Continuous monitoring of program transactions and activity, with the ability to identify, fraud, non-compliance and improper payments both prospectively and retrospectively;

“(3)The ability to detect non-traditional fraud such as program eligibility issues and identify theft;

“(4)Use of state-of-the-art analytical techniques, including without limitation;

“(A)Predictive modeling;

“(B)Complex pattern analysis;

“(C)Link analysis;

“(D)Text mining; and

“(E)Geospatial analysis;

“(5)Feedback and self-learning capability to adapt to changing schemes and trends;

“(6)Advanced entity resolution capabilities to create a holistic view of entities across state agencies, programs and databases; and

“(7)The ability to extend and adapt to all areas of state government; and

“(8)Demonstrate experience hosting sensitive and regulated state data.

“(f)The office shall enter into a vendor license agreement for the project in an amount not to exceed the potential cost savings as estimated by the office in cooperation with impacted state agencies under the project.

“(1)Payments shall be structured to coincide with expected savings.

“(g)Unless extended, the project shall expire 24 months after implementation;

“(h)After implementation, the Office of Accounting in the Department of Finance and Administration shall provide annual reports to the co-chairs of the Joint Performance Review Committee and the House and Senate Committees on State Agencies and the Health Reform Legislative Task Force;

“(i)A report under this section shall include without limitation:

“(1)Comprehensive data regarding the establishment and operations of the Enterprise Fraud Pilot Project; and

“(2)The resources and processes of each participating state agency to investigate the leads provided by the vendor; and

“(3)Incidents, types and amounts of fraud identified by state agency; and

“(4)The amount actually recovered as a result of fraud identifications by state agency; and

“(5)Expected cost avoidance through benefits not issued or denied, pre-payment intervention, and future behavior change through intervention; and

“(6)Procedural changes resulting from fraud identification and the timeline for implementation each by state agency.”

Acts 2016, No. 248, § 23, provided: “ENTERPRISE FRAUD PILOT PROJECT.

“(a)So that savings to Arkansas businesses and taxpayers and recoveries may be realized as soon as possible, at the direction of the Governor, the Office of Accounting in the Department of Finance and Administration shall initiate the Enterprise Fraud Pilot Project focused on fraud, waste, abuse, and improper payments, and employer compliance within the Department of Workforce Services' Unemployment Insurance program, the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program, and the Department of Human Services' Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program that will implement state-of-the-art enterprise fraud detection technology that can further support detection and prevention across state agencies, programs and functions.

“(b)Unless precluded under federal law or regulation or under state law, the Department of Workforce Services' Unemployment Insurance program, the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program, and the Department of Human Services' Supplemental Nutrition Assistance program may support and participate in the efforts of the Department to develop the Enterprise Fraud Pilot Project.

“(c)Unless precluded under federal law or regulation or state law, each state agency shall share any and all data under its control or administration that might have value in detecting or preventing fraud and abuse.

“(d)Upon initiation by the Governor, the request for a bid shall be sent to the Health Reform Legislative Task Force for review, and their recommendation shall be submitted to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee.

“(e)At the direction of the Governor, the department shall enter into a vendor license agreement for the operation of a vendor hosted fraud, waste, abuse and improper payments detection and prevention system. Vendor technology for the project shall include without limitation the following capabilities:

“(1)Automated detection and alerting;

“(2)Continuous monitoring of program transactions and activity, with the ability to identify, fraud, non-compliance and improper payments both prospectively and retrospectively;

“(3)The ability to detect non-traditional fraud such as program eligibility issues and identify theft;

“(4)Use of state-of-the-art analytical techniques, including without limitation;

“(A)Predictive modeling;

“(B)Complex pattern analysis;

“(C)Link analysis;

“(D)Text mining; and

“(E)Geospatial analysis;

“(5)Feedback and self-learning capability to adapt to changing schemes and trends;

“(6)Advanced entity resolution capabilities to create a holistic view of entities across state agencies, programs and databases; and

“(7)The ability to extend and adapt to all areas of state government; and

“(8)Demonstrate experience hosting sensitive and regulated state data.

“(f)The office shall enter into a vendor license agreement for the project in an amount not to exceed the potential cost savings as estimated by the office in cooperation with impacted state agencies under the project.

“(1)Payments shall be structured to coincide with expected savings.

“(g)Unless extended, the project shall expire 24 months after implementation;

“(h)After implementation, the Office of Accounting in the Department of Finance and Administration shall provide annual reports to the co-chairs of the Joint Performance Review Committee and the House and Senate Committees on State Agencies and the Health Reform Legislative Task Force;

“(i)A report under this section shall include without limitation:

“(1)Comprehensive data regarding the establishment and operations of the Enterprise Fraud Pilot Project; and

“(2)The resources and processes of each participating state agency to investigate the leads provided by the vendor; and

“(3)Incidents, types and amounts of fraud identified by state agency; and

“(4)The amount actually recovered as a result of fraud identifications by state agency; and

“(5)Expected cost avoidance through benefits not issued or denied, pre-payment intervention, and future behavior change through intervention; and

“(6)Procedural changes resulting from fraud identification and the timeline for implementation each by state agency.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Cross References. Fiscal duties of Department of Finance and Administration, §19-1-201 et seq.

Penalty for “hot checks” paid to Department of Finance and Administration, §19-2-203.

Effective Dates. Acts 1967, No. 466, § 6: Mar. 31, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is hereby declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that planning must be made for the Personnel Division created herein and for the continuation of the studies authorized herein and an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1967, No. 468, § 12: Mar. 31, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is hereby declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that several months preparation will be required for the transitions which are authorized herein on July 1, 1967, and in order to make these preparations this Act should take effect and be in force from the date of its approval. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 44, § 10: Feb. 21, 1968. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and determined by the First Extraordinary Session of the Sixty-Sixth General Assembly that efficiency and economy are desirable traits in state government; that improved marketing and redistribution of property would provide better utilization of the state's assets; and that if certain economies and efficiency are going to be undertaken in state government, then the immediate passage of this act is necessary. Now, therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1971, No. 38, §§ 23, 24: reorganizations under act to be completed on or before July 1, 1971. Act effective Feb. 4, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is an immediate need to establish a more responsive and responsible state government sufficiently flexible to meet changing conditions and to establish executive authority in those areas where executive responsibility presently lies and to promote economies in the operation of the government by the consolidation of various departments, boards, and commissions; and that only by the immediate passage of this act may procedures be established for effectuating a more responsive, responsible, and economic state government. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1972 (Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 4: Feb. 18, 1972. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and determined by the Sixty-Eighth General Assembly meeting in Extraordinary Session that Act 44 of 1968 should include such language that would enable the county, municipal, or other local government units to utilize the services of the Marketing and Redistribution Section of the Department of Finance and Administration. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 806, § 8: July 1, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Sixty-Ninth General Assembly that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two-year period; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1973 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1973 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and providing of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1973.”

Acts 1973, No. 876, § 35: July 1, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It being determined by the General Assembly that the proper and effective management and control of State finances requires that the provisions of this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1973.”

Acts 1977, No. 436, § 2: July 1, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It being determined by the General Assembly that the proper and effective management and control of State finances requires that the provisions of this Act be implemented at the commencement of the next biennium and this Act is necessary for the proper management of the financial affairs of the State, therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1977.”

Acts 1993, No. 931, § 34 and No. 957, § 14: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1993 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1993 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1995, No. 226, § 33: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1995 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1995 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1999, No. 1428, § 33: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1999 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1999 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2007, No. 751, § 38: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act dissolves and transfers the duties of the Executive Chief Information Officer, Chief Information Officer, and Office of Information Technology; and that dissolving the offices at the beginning of the state's fiscal year will result in a more efficient transfer of responsibilities and funds. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2017, No. 365, § 29: July 1, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the fiscal year for employees begins on July 1 of every year and that the implementation of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act is necessary to ensure the continued services and operations of the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2017.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1967, No. 468, abolished the Office of State Comptroller and transferred its powers and duties to the State Administration Department. It also transferred the State Purchasing Department into the State Administration Department.

Acts 1969, No. 286 transferred the powers, functions, and duties of the Division of Local Affairs and Audits of the State Administration Department to the Division of Local Affairs and Audits of the Division of Legislative Audit.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 5, in part, transferred the State Administration Department and the Department of Revenue, by type 2 transfers, to the Department of Finance and Administration. The section also transferred the Surplus Property Program (§19-11-601 et seq.) to the Department by a type 2 transfer and located it in the Purchasing Division of the Office of State Purchasing. The section transferred the Arkansas Racing Commission (§23-110-201 et seq.), by a type 1 transfer, to the Division of Racing of the Department of Finance and Administration and transferred the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control, by a type 1 transfer, to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of that department.

Acts 1971, No. 38, §§ 5 and 14, as amended by Acts 1973, No. 710, §§ 2 and 3, transferred the Enforcement Division of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Commission to the Department of Public Safety by a type 2 transfer. The Department of Public Safety was abolished by Acts 1981, No. 45, and § 9 of that act transferred the Enforcement Division to the Department of Finance and Administration where it operates as a separate division known as the Enforcement Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control.

Acts 1977, No. 884, § 4, abolished the Administrative Services Division of the Department of Finance and Administration and transferred all of its powers, duties, equipment, etc. respecting electronic data processing services and a central telephone system for state agencies to the Department of Information Systems (§25-4-101 et seq.). All duties of the Administrative Services Division not transferred to the Department of Computer Services were to be reassigned to other divisions by the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

Acts 1981, No. 764, § 4, transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration the powers and duties of the Department of Local Services (abolished) with respect to the Intergovernmental Personnel Act program, the HUD 701 program, and the revenue-sharing assistance program, and with respect to various state grant programs including, but not limited to, planning and development grants, state community grants, and the Ozark Regional Commission — State Contribution.

Acts 1987, No. 68, § 1, provided that the Surplus Property Program, §19-11-601 et seq., which was transferred by a Type 2 transfer to the Department of Finance and Administration, was transferred by a Type 2 transfer to the Vocational and Technical Education Division of the State Department of Education.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Creation — Director” in the section heading; substituted “secretary” or “secretary’s” for “director” or “director’s” throughout the section; deleted former (a) and (b) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; added “subject to the transfer of a division or department of the Department of Finance and Administration as a state entity under this act” at the end of (a)(1); substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (b) and (d); and, in (c), substituted “secretary” for “director of the department” at the end of the first sentence and “Department of Finance and Administration” for “department” at the end of the last sentence.

Meaning of “this act”. The reference is to the Transformation and Efficiencies Act of 2019, Acts 2019, No. 910, which is codified throughout the Arkansas Code.

Cross References. Arkansas Information Systems Act, §25-4-101 et seq.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2014, No. 300, § 14, provided: “AUTHORITY TO EMPLOY CERTIFIED LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS. The Director of the Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to employ not more than one (1) certified law enforcement officer as certified under §12-9-101 et seq. The certified law enforcement officer employed under this section shall be responsible for maintaining order and providing for the security, protection, and safety of Department buildings, grounds, property, employees and customers. The certified law enforcement officer shall have the powers, duties, privileges, and immunities of a certified law enforcement officer.”

Acts 2015, No. 924, § 14, provided:

“AUTHORITY TO EMPLOY CERTIFIED LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS. The Director of the Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to employ not more than one (1) certified law enforcement officer as certified under §12-9-101 et seq. The certified law enforcement officer employed under this section shall be responsible for maintaining order and providing for the security, protection, and safety of Department buildings, grounds, property, employees and customers. The certified law enforcement officer shall have the powers, duties, privileges, and immunities of a certified law enforcement officer.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Acts 2016, No. 117, § 14, provided:

“AUTHORITY TO EMPLOY CERTIFIED LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS. The Director of the Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to employ not more than one (1) certified law enforcement officer as certified under §12-9-101 et seq. The certified law enforcement officer employed under this section shall be responsible for maintaining order and providing for the security, protection, and safety of Department buildings, grounds, property, employees and customers. The certified law enforcement officer shall have the powers, duties, privileges, and immunities of a certified law enforcement officer.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (a); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “secretary” for “director” in the section heading and (b), (c), and (d); and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a) and (d).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the Office of Personnel Management and the State Personnel Administrator, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6301, effective July 1, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 1967, No. 466, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-810; Acts 2017, No. 365, § 28; 2019, No. 392, §2.

For current law, see §25-43-1504.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 10; 1981, No. 64, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-910; Acts 1987, No. 771, § 2; Acts 1991, No. 773, § 7; 1995, No. 297, § 5; 1999, No. 1323, § 54; 2009, No. 1469, § 31; 2019, No. 910, § 2382.

25-6-103 — 25-6-106. [Repealed.]

(1)The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education is the sole and official issuer of local education agency numbers to educational entities in the state.

These numbers shall be issued, activated, deactivated, or changed according to the annual schedule and in a format established by the division.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an educational entity shall not be recognized as a public school district or entitled to the rights and privileges of a school district solely because the educational entity has been assigned a local education agency number.

The State Board of Education shall adopt the necessary rules to fully implement this section.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2151, § 20; 2019, No. 910, § 2383.

Subchapter 2

— Division of Rehabilitation Services

25-6-201 — 25-6-205. [Repealed.]

25-6-301 — 25-6-308. [Repealed.]

25-7-101. Creation — Director — Organization — Personnel.

There is created a Division of Higher Education.

(1)The executive head of the Division of Higher Education shall be the Director of the Division of Higher Education.

The director shall be appointed, in consultation with the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board, by the Governor and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

The Division of Higher Education shall consist of the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board and any other divisions which may be created by law and placed under the Division of Higher Education.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-909; Acts 1997, No. 1114, § 14; 2017, No. 866, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 2384.